Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-127] Failure to obey order or
regulation. Any person subject to this chapter who:

(1) Violates or fails to obey any lawful general
order or regulation;

(2) Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued
by a member of the state military forces which it is the person's duty to obey,
fails to obey the order; or

(3) Is derelict in the performance of the person's
duties;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next